CSO 

<F P=106> [Article from PROMYSHLENNYY VESTNIK Supplement to RABOCHAYA </F>
TRIBUNA by the Interagency Commission for Energy Strategy: 
"Russia's Energy Strategy: the Main Points"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  A Necessary Foreword </H5>
  Today, PROMYSHLENNYY VESTNIK presents to its readers 
"Russia's Energy Strategy." This is the Russian Federation's 
integrated state fuel and energy program for the period up to 
the year 2010. 
  Its significance is determined by a whole series of 
factors. We will name just a few of them. 
  -- Russia has the largest reserves of fuel and energy 
resources and the world's second largest fuel and energy 
complex; 
  -- This complex brings in more than two-thirds of the 
country's currency revenues. In contrast to the majority of 
countries, Russia's TEK [Fuel and Energy Complex] is not simply 
an infrastructure sector of its national economy, but rather, 
the foundation of the entire economy; 
  -- Russia's Energy Strategy is the foundation and core 
of the economic doctrine for the revitalization of the Russian 
State. 
  A large collective of scholars and specialists worked 
on this document under the guidance of the Interagency 
Coordinating Commission headed by RF [Russian Federation] 
Minister of Fuel and Energy Yu. Shafranik. The main points of 
Russia's Energy Strategy were approved at an expanded meeting of 
the Interagency Commission. With due consideration of comments 
and suggestions made during discussion of the program in the 
ministries, agencies, public organizations and the mass media, 
Russia's Energy Strategy will be revised and submitted to the 
Russian Government for consideration. 
  We hope that our readers will also express their 
comments, opinions and suggestions. 
<H5>  I. Both the Engine and the Hostage </H5>
  The fuel and energy complex (TEK) occupies a special 
place in the economy. Figuratively speaking, it is the main 
engine of industry and a condition for the existence of the 
populace. From the electric railway and the airplane on 
transport routes and the machine tool and blast furnace in a 
shop to the gas stove, the electric bulb and the television set 
in an apartment -- all these things operate thanks to the energy 
supplied to them. A source of movement, heat and light and an 
information transmitter, in our time, the TEK is finding new 
"professions," making a person's life more comfortable and 
meaningful. This is why now, in the complicated reform times, 
the future fortunes of the fuel and power industry, without any 
exaggeration, are occupying the minds of all Russian 
citizens. 
  There are special reasons for this. Yes, one of the world's 
most powerful systems for ensuring vital needs and economic 
security has been created in Russia. Our country generates more 
than 10 percent of the world production of fuel. Also certain is 
the fact that Russia's fuel and energy complex is currently 
fully meeting the needs of the public and material production 
for fuel and energy. We would remind you that, last year, 70 
percent of all currency revenues was also obtained through the 
exporting of energy resources and the cross-delivery of 
commodity resources from the CIS [Commonwealth of Independent 
States] for industrial and consumer needs was ensured. It is no 
secret, however, that the overall amount of power output has 
fallen by 20 percent over the last 5 years and is continuing to 
fall. Just in 1993, Russia produced 8 percent fewer energy 
resources than it could have. But the country has not felt an 
acute shortage of them for a simple reason: under the conditions 
of the growing production slump in all sectors, energy 
consumption has fallen sharply in both industry and agriculture. 
So the energy sufficiency has turned out to be largely relative. 
Moreover, the TEK has sold the produced output to its 
traditional consumers within the country on credit, as a rule, a 
debt which has reached the gigantic sum of 10 trillion rubles 
[R], which is larger than half of all of Russia's debts taken 
together. This illusory wealth has driven the economy's powerful 
complex into a financial impasse. Called upon to enliven the 
economy, it has had to hold back on even the most necessary 
retooling, not to mention the introduction of new production. 
Yet, indeed, in order to maintain, for example, oil production 
at least at the current level, up to $5 billion annually need to 
be invested in this sector. However, capital investments in the 
energy complex, just in the past year, decreased by nearly a 
third. The TEK is losing its former industrial might. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-15A>      Gas Production in Billions of Cubic Meters </FIG>


  In a number of subdivisions of the oil and gas industries, 
the capacities in power engineering have begun to fall into 
decay calamitously rapidly. For example, more than 30,000 oil 
wells are now standing idle. But the plant which could 
straighten out the matter of the express delivery of spare parts 
is located in belligerent sovereign Azerbaijan. Nearly 70 
percent of the predicted hydrocarbon resources still require 
expensive surveying. Without this imperative work, the 
development of oil and gas production, especially at nearly 
inaccessible sites, will be in a state of confusion. In Russia, 
more than 80 coal mines need to be renovated without delay, 
because they are being plagued by accidents which frequently 
take human lives. Quite a few critical problems have arisen at 
electric power plants, including nuclear ones. If you add to 
this the fact that only 30 percent of the heating systems in the 
cities are operating correctly, while the rest, here and there, 
are warming the high heavens, -- even this small list of 
problems testifies to the fact that crisis situations are making 
themselves known in the energy sectors with ever increasing 
imperiousness. 
  How can they be overcome with the most minimal of losses? 
What kind of energy policy should be pursued so that, in the 
final tally, it would yield a perceptible benefit for each 
inhabitant of the country? The answers to these questions are 
provided by Russia's Energy Strategy, the drafting of which has 
just been completed. First of all, in all sectors, it is 
necessary to get rid of the antiquated habit of regarding the 
TEK as a gratuitous donor to the economy, because the transition 
to market relations, caused by the radical change in Russia's 
social and economic structure, is by no means a one-way street. 
  However, already, the first reform steps within the fuel and 
energy complex, the establishment of commercial companies which 
fastidiously began to establish market structures around 
themselves and not just to produce the raw material, but also to 
process it, providing up-to-date service to the consumer and 
delivering the end products to him for the price which they 
actually cost, caused a squall of completely unfounded 
accusations in the mass media. The drafters of the new Russian 
Energy Strategy consider it necessary to talk with the public 
right away in order to make their point in this controversy. The 
truth behind the accusations that the energy suppliers, having 
revised the prices for energy resources, caused a new, sharp 
surge of inflation, is obvious. Over the years of the wasteful 
"cannibalistic" economy, there developed in our country a 
careless squandering of energy resources in production and 
everyday life, at a level exceeding their expenditure in 
industrialized countries by a factor of 2-3. Market relations 
have inserted their own authoritative correction into domestic 
practice. Henceforth, the expenditure of energy will be 
controlled by the ruble. It is understandable that breaking an 
ingrained habit is hard, but it must be done, even though not 
everyone likes this.... 
  As for inflation, the energy resources price revision is 
least of all "at fault" here. Here are the official statistical 
data for last year: the share of fuel outlays in the overall 
industrial expenditures amounted to only 7-8 percent. 
  Allusions have been made to the very rapid rise of prices in 
domestic machine building. They are really striking: last year, 
they jumped 500 percent. However, a detailed analysis has shown 
that the prices in machine building rose only by 25 percent due 
to fuel and energy resources. Thus, the new prices for energy 
resources, which, according to the calculations, amount to just 
30 percent of world prices, played almost no role in the 
acceleration of the inflationary spiral and the market approach 
to price setting in the fuel and energy complex should be 
exonerated in the eyes of the public. 
  Then where does the root of all the problems lie? Our 
specialists believe that it lies in the exorbitantly high taxes. 
In their opinion, the TEK is so hobbled by the tax fetters that 
it has been literally left without the means of subsistence. 
Independent experts from Oxford cite one more reason -- the 
harsh credit policy. According to their calculations, up to 83 
percent of inflation is occurring because of the high credit 
rates. Any enterprise forced to obtain money from the banks at 
enormous interest rates in order to survive will try to jack up 
the prices for its own products. A new round of inflation 
inevitably follows this. It is perfectly obvious that 
loan-financed investment plans under such conditions will remain 
just plans. This is the very "stranglehold" on the TEK from 
which it is trying unsuccessfully in the meanwhile to free 
itself at least partly so that those who produce energy and 
those who use it might breathe easier. 
  This is why, having examined carefully the entire chain of 
interrelations -- the TEK -- the budget -- the consumer, the 
drafters of the Energy Strategy believe that changes in the very 
attitude toward the fuel and energy complex and its output on 
the part of the state and on the part of all citizens of Russia 
have become imminent. This requires both new laws and improved 
standard acts, which take into consideration world experience, 
and also up-to-date measures which will have an economic impact. 
  Elaborated in the Energy Strategy is a complete set of means 
for the development of Russia's power engineering, which 
includes: 
  -- the improvement of energy consumption and the promotion 
of 
energy conservation; 
  -- the optimization of the regions' energy interconnections; 
  -- the economically justified exporting of energy resources; 
  -- the renovation and efficient development of the TEK's 
production structure; 
  -- and scientific and technical progress in power 
engineering 
and related sectors. 
<H5>  II. Goals and Priorities of the New Energy Strategy </H5>
  Russia has a unique fuel and energy potential. Even 
now, found in its investigated mineral sites have been 13.4 
percent of the world's oil reserves, 41.7 percent of the gas 
reserves and 43 percent of the coal reserves. This has made it 
possible to create the world's second largest fuel industry, 
which produces more than 10 percent of the world production of 
raw fuel material. Russia's Energy Strategy has set as its main 
goal the maximum efficient use of natural riches for 
revitalizing the country's economy and raising the standard of 
living of its populace (bringing it up to the level of the 
European standards of living). 
  The required and maximum scenarios for the TEK's development 
and that of its sectors have been worked out with due 
consideration of the conditions of the domestic and foreign 
markets. 
  The TEK's required development has been determined so as to 
supply, on a guaranteed basis, the energy needs of Russia given 
reduced energy consumption (i.e., with maximum energy 
conservation) and the greatest economically justified exporting 
of energy resources or (what amounts to approximately the same 
thing) given an increase in energy consumption and a reduction 
in exporting. The TEK's maximum development will require that, 
if there is an increase in energy consumption (i.e., with likely 
amounts of energy conservation), favorable conditions be put 
together for a high level of exporting of Russian energy 
resources. 
  Both scenarios for the production of energy resources 
realize 
in essence a single strategy for the TEK's development, but they 
differ in the time frames, scale and, in some instances, in the 
sequence of operations. But, in both scenarios, what is 
envisioned, first and foremost, is an increase in the efficiency 
of direct energy services with a simultaneous decrease in the 
harmful impact of fuel and energy enterprises on the 
environment, which is different for each Russian citizen. In 
connection with this, the task is being set for the next 10-15 
years for shaping a socially- and economically-sound demand for 
energy services based on the principle of reasonable 
sufficiency. What will be achieved is a stable supply of fuel 
and energy for all consumers, with priority supplying of 
municipal and domestic needs, public transportation and the 
foodstuffs sphere with high-quality and ecologically clean 
energy resources. For example, up to half of the produced energy 
resources will be directed toward the production of consumer 
goods by the year 2000, which is 20 percent more than what is 
being allotted currently for these needs. This will be achieved 
through the shift from military-industrial products and heavy 
machine building to the widespread production of consumer goods. 
Special attention will be paid to improving the energy supply of 
Russia's rural localities. At the same time, the main task will 
be energy support for the radical social and economic 
transformations in the countryside and the accelerated 
introduction of advanced electrified and gas technologies and 
devices, as well as modern technologies based on liquid and 
high-quality graded fuel or briquetted solid fuel, capable of 
providing a radical improvement in everyday and working 
conditions, and, consequently, a high level of acclimatization 
of the rural populace: intensive resource conservation, 
preservation and the quality of agricultural products, an 
increase in capital productivity and the productivity of human 
labor in rural regions and, thereby, a sharp improvement in the 
efficiency of agricultural production. Most widely used will be 
concise, ecologically clean energy sources. In particular, 
contemplated for 1995 is the conducting of the experimental 
operation of a system for supplying energy to farmsteads, using 
non-traditional renewable energy sources. 
  The reorientation of energy consumption from industrial 
needs 
to supporting the public's vital needs has already become 
distinctly apparent in the last 3 years. This has been helped by 
the introduction of preferential rates for energy resources for 
everyday needs and part of the service-sphere enterprises, for 
agriculture and for public transportation. The benefits for 
energy conservation in these spheres will need to be retained 
for quite a long while yet (at least until the beginning of the 
economy's recovery from the economic crisis), decreasing them 
relatively and, what is the main thing, making them all more 
applicable. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-17A>      Production of Oil and of Gas Condensates in Millions of Metric Tons </FIG>


  Based on the extent of the increase in the populace's 
prosperity, its priority in being supplied with energy will be 
ensured more and more not by the preferential rates, but rather, 
fully by the paying demands of people for comfort and an 
increase in the quality of life as a whole. 
  The social reorientation of energy consumption will become 
apparent most obviously with respect to the highest-quality 
energy resource -- electricity. Whereas, in 1985, 29.5 percent 
of the total electric consumption went for the vital needs of 
the populace and, in 1990, the figure was 31.1 percent, this 
component will increase to 41-42 percent by 2000 and to 43-44 
percent by 2010. 
  In the area of centralized heating, the share of heating and 
the hot-water supply for municipal and domestic needs has always 
been traditionally high and amounted to 42-43 percent. The 
planned increase in providing the populace with housing and 
public buildings will cause a further increase in the share of 
this component of the centralized heating consumption to 44 
percent in 2000 and to 48-49 percent in 2010, despite all 
energy-conservation measures. 
  This trend will become apparent even more distinctly in 
supplying the populace's everyday needs using direct burning 
fuel: the increase by 2010 in the share of gas in the 
satisfaction of these needs by a factor of 1.5 on average and by 
a factor of nearly 2 in the countryside is an important social 
priority of the Energy Strategy. 
  The main means for the realization of this priority under 
the 
new economic conditions will be, in the first stage, 
preferential rates for gas and, subsequently, special measures 
for economic stimulation of rural gas facility installation: 
preferential credits for the construction of networks and the 
purchase of equipment and the joint conversion to joint-stock 
companies of RAO [Russian Joint-Stock Company] Gazprom [gas 
industry] and the gas-distribution companies and so on. 
  On the whole, the policy for the reorientation of energy 
consumption toward supplying the vital needs of the populace 
with the widespread use of the appropriate benefits and other 
economic incentives will lead to an increase in the share of 
these needs in the total consumption of primary energy resources 
in Russia from 24-25 percent at present to 28-29 percent in 2000 
and to 30-32 percent in 2010. 
  The social orientation of Russia's Energy Strategy also 
means 
it will be possible for any consumer by 2000 to make an 
economically sound selection of energy resources for his own 
energy needs. It is precisely at this that the so-called 
multipurpose "gas pause" is aimed -- a sharp increase in the 
share of natural gas in domestic consumption and in the energy 
exporting structure. 
  To be more specific, gas will amount to more than half of 
the 
entire production of energy resources in the country during the 
period in question. 
  In the scenario for the TEK's required development, the gas 
industry, up to 2003-2005, will be able to develop further 
without setting up large, new fuel centers, making maximum use 
of medium and even small fields in the developed gas-producing 
regions or in the immediate vicinity of the consumers. In the 
maximum scenario, by 2000, it will be necessary to develop the 
first section of the new Yamal gas-producing region, i.e., to 
begin the largest investment program by 1995. 
  It will be necessary to carry out basic renovation and 
partial replacement of the Unified Gas-Supply System for the 
purpose of increasing its energy and economic efficiency, to 
develop a system of underground gas-storage tanks in order to 
increase the reliability of the national economy's gas supply 
and the degree to which it can be manipulated and to increase 
several-fold the extraction of useful components from the 
produced gas (first of all, condensate, methane and other 
hydrocarbons). The present relatively stable state of the gas 
industry and its prospects for the near future make this 
management approach quite realistic. It must be emphasized that 
preference is being given to using gas in thermal power 
engineering while introducing the latest technologies for PGU 
and GTU [steam-and-gas and gas-turbine plants] and to replacing 
motor fuel with gas. In order to do this, there will be an 
increase in the production of motor vehicles with gas cylinders 
and gas equipment sets and expansion of the network of AGNKS 
[automated gas pumping and compressor stations] and the 
production of new-design gas cylinders has been organized. 
Together with the accelerated increase in electrification (by a 
third up to the year 2000), this will make it possible to reduce 
the use of other, environmentally harmful types of fuel by no 
less than 20 percent. 
  Similar highly economical manipulation of ecologically clean 
types of energy will make it possible to re-equip all sectors of 
the fuel and energy complex on a new scientific basis, to render 
their production harmless to a great extent, to reduce 
expenditures of materials and energy for the production of 
Russian goods by no less than a third and thereby to enhance 
their attractiveness in the world market. 
  The "gas pause," directly and indirectly, will have a 
beneficial effect, first of all, on the oil and coal industries 
and on power engineering. Prior to the year 2000, the oil 
production slump will be overcome and stable deliveries of raw 
hydrocarbon material and an increase in its integrated use will 
be achieved. In order to do this, it is necessary to maintain 
oil production at a level of no fewer than 270-280 million 
metric tons per year. It is being assumed that there will be a 
further intensification in the refining of oil up to 75 percent 
in 2000 and to 83-84 percent in 2010 given a radical renovation 
of the entire oil-refining industry, which will substantially 
increase the sale of gasoline and lubricants and tires for the 
increasing stream of vehicles in industry and among the 
populace, as well as of raw material for the chemical and 
microbiological industries. In turn, this will increase the 
production of currently so scarce medicines and the no less 
necessary latest rubbers with previously specified properties. 
And from here it is a straight path to the rubber parts being 
used ever more widely in machine building. In modern trucks, 
their number is increasing annually; In a KamAZ [Kama Motor 
Vehicle Plant truck], for example, there are already more than a 
thousand of them. The interdependence, the complicated 
interconnections and transformations of energy products from the 
well to the motor vehicle tire or conveyor belt, has found its 
own specific and well-founded embodiment in Russia's Energy 
Strategy. It has been calculated that the program for 
modernizing and renovating the oil-refining industry will take 
around 12-14 years and be implemented in stages. Among the most 
important work is the expansion of the network of motor vehicle 
service stations, the number of which, based on a competitive 
market environment, will increase by the year 2000 by a factor 
of approximately 2. 
  Tracked in no less detail have been the means for enhancing 
the quality of coal products -- from the large-scale shift to 
economical open-pit mining of this solid fuel at large fields to 
the introduction of safe technologies for the processing and use 
of coal. For the first time, a purely market emphasis is being 
placed not simply on delivering to the consumer the " 
combustible rock" in its natural form, but its highly profitable 
and, for the consumer (entrepreneur, farmer and vacationer), 
attractive conversion into coal pulp and briquets of an 
appropriate quality. Based on these examples, the Energy 
Program, besides other things, will teach the owner of natural 
warehouses modern enterprise and specific consideration of the 
consumer's interests. 
  The restructuring of Russia's coal industry is a most 
difficult task, requiring maximum caution and comprehensive 
consideration of social factors. 
  In the scenario for the TEK's required development, coal 
mining will decrease right up to 2005, and especially rapidly -- 
in the country's European regions. An increase in mining under 
these conditions is expected at mines of the Kuznetsk and 
Kansko-Achinsk basins in order to supply the regions of Siberia 
and partly the Urals, while setting aside the remaining basins 
more and more for the supplying of coal primarily to local 
customers. 
  In the maximum scenario, an increase in coal mining in the 
country is forecast by the year 2000, with its acceleration 
during the subsequent period with priority development of the 
Kuznetsk Basin and the KATEK [Kansko-Achinsk Fuel and Energy 
Complex] mainly in order to supply fuel to the electric power 
plants. The Energy Strategy reminds us at the same time: coal is 
the future. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-19A>      Coal Mining in Millions of Metric Tons </FIG>


  The greatest spreading of the development scenarios will be 
in electric power engineering and heating. 
  Given maximum energy conservation (the TEK's required 
development), the development of electric power engineering may 
be aimed not at increasing the installed capacity of the 
electric power plants, but rather, mainly at their radical 
renovation. Under these conditions, it is possible to abandon 
the construction of new condensing power plants in the majority 
of the country's regions and to ensure bringing new AES [nuclear 
power plant] units on line basically at the same pace as the 
removal from operation of first-generation reactors and RBMK 
reactors, while the development of electric power engineering 
may be carried out by the renovation of new TETss [heat and 
power plants] with gas-turbine and steam-and-gas plants. 
Moreover, given these conditions, it will be no big problem if 
there is a decrease in the capacity of AESs due to a delay in 
the development of new-generation nuclear reactors (the scenario 
of a temporary moratorium on the development of nuclear power 
engineering). 
  In contrast to this, the TEK's maximum development will 
require significant efforts not only for renovation but also for 
increasing the capacity of all types of electric power plants 
with their orientation toward different types of energy 
resources. This much more expensive scenario for the development 
of electric power engineering will also require, along with 
renovating existing TETss and constructing new ones using gas, 
increasing the capacity of AESs in regions of expensive fuel and 
constructing several powerful condensing electric power plants 
using Kansko-Achinsk and Kuznetsk coal in Siberia, the Urals and 
possibly the Volga River Region. 
  Envisioned in a number of remote regions of Russia's North 
and Northeast has been the construction of low-capacity nuclear 
plants of modular design, including underground ones as well. On 
the whole, the share of nuclear power engineering will remain as 
before and, by 2000, will amount to around 11.5-12 percent of 
the total production of energy and, by 2010, to 10-11.5 percent. 
  The share of hydraulic power engineering in individual 
regions of the country, particularly in the Far East, may 
increase significantly through the more complete use of the 
power-producing potential of rivers and the construction of a 
series of medium-capacity GESs [hydroelectric power plants]. 
  Also envisioned in the store of energy sources in the period 
in question is the more active development of local energy 
resources (small reserves of coal, gas and oil in regions with a 
developed infrastructure), as well as renewable and recycled 
energy resources (wind, geothermal, solar and water power, mine 
methane, lumber waste and industrial waste), especially for 
regions with scattered energy consumers. 
  Proclaimed as a main feature of the energy policy for the 
next few years and for the long run, in contrast to the former 
orientation toward a large-scale increase in the production of 
fuel and energy resources, and the highest priority of Russia's 
Energy Strategy is maximum energy conservation with a 
simultaneous increase in the efficiency of energy consumption. 
In contrast to traditional Russian wastefulness (we have plenty 
of everything!), henceforth, the habit of using energy sparingly 
will be inculcated more and more. In this matter, we no longer 
have anywhere to which to retreat: here we are, as in many other 
things, truly "ahead of the whole world": the expenditure of 
energy per unit of product produced in Russia is higher by a 
factor of 2 than in the USA with a similar production structure. 
This is why it is being emphasized in the Energy Strategy that 
there is nothing cheaper and nothing more profitable literally 
for each Russian citizen than the thrifty expenditure of energy 
in production and in everyday life. Ultimately, Russian citizens 
should prove that they are able to count kilograms, kilowatts 
and meters just as zealously as they have been able to obtain or 
produce them. Enterprise in the conservation of resources will 
become the business of all of society, if the press, radio and 
television appeal to it unobtrusively, with psychological 
precision. Henceforth, a significant portion of advertising 
time, especially in the electronic mass media, should be given 
to the problems of energy conservation with a graphic 
demonstration of its results and the means of achieving it. A 
special Russian Federation State Prize could be awarded to 
far-sighted technical and economic innovations aimed at every 
possible kind of energy conservation. 
  This will arouse the obvious interest of every inhabitant of 
the country, if one thing is not disregarded, i.e., the not 
insignificant circumstance, which is being given special 
emphasis in the Energy Strategy, that the Energy Conservation 
Program already approved by the government prescribes a 
combination of economic and directive measures. The energy 
policy up to the year 2000 provides, first and foremost, for 
active economic stimulation of energy resource conservation 
through price factors; the placing into effect of standards and 
certificates for energy-consuming and widely used equipment; 
equipping the consumers with instruments for metering and 
regulating the expenditure of energy resources; and the right to 
sell them at freely-set prices within Russia and partially 
exporting them. Federal and regional energy-conservation funds 
are being established. 
  Being introduced are preferential granting of credit and 
partial financing using budget assets and the funds of consumers 
who make the most of energy-conservation measures. The Energy 
Strategy grants local organs of executive authority the right to 
impose, when need be, based on the findings of Gosenergonadzor 
[state committee for energy use oversight], economic sanctions 
for wasting energy, as well as to impose a system of 
energy-consumption quotas for gas, heat and electricity. 
  Organizational measures for saving energy both in the next 
few years and in the long run will be actively supported by a 
purposeful technical policy which will be geared toward: a 
maximum reduction of losses and an increase in the energy 
efficiency of equipment and technologies in all energy-producing 
(including production and transport) and energy-consuming 
processes; the development of ecologically and technologically 
safe equipment; an efficient centralized energy supply and 
decentralization of energy sources with a maximum effort to 
locate them near energy consumers in order to reduce their 
investment cycle; the encouragement of the establishment of 
in-house energy sources at industrial enterprises, including 
those which use industrial waste; preference being given to the 
renovation of existing power installations over the construction 
of new, large power installations; the widespread use of the 
resources of conversion systems (gas turbines and new materials 
and technologies) for the production and use of energy; the 
industrial development (with state support) of qualitatively new 
technologies for nuclear power engineering, the thorough 
processing of coal and the storage of energy; new energy 
sources; and maximum accident and economical safety of all 
energy capacities without exception. 
  In determining this system of measures, Russia's Energy 
Strategy is proceeding from the fact that, given the current 
level of energy intensiveness of products, by the year 2000 or 
even sooner, an unsatisfied demand for energy resources may 
emerge in the amount of 400-450 million metric tons of 
equivalent fuel. It is impossible to provide it through an 
increase in the production of TER [fuel and energy resources]. 
Domestic products will not be able to compete in the world 
market because of their so low energy efficiency. 
  What will help in this situation is the saving of energy 
resources. Calculations made by specialists for the Energy 
Strategy show that the annual requirement for fuel and energy 
may be reduced by 55-60 million metric tons of equivalent fuel. 
And, by the year 2000, it may be reduced by 200-250 million 
metric tons of equivalent fuel while maintaining the volume of 
goods production of industrial products and services and while 
enhancing the quality and competitiveness. The specialists 
believe that, in the near future, the expenditures of just oil 
alone may decrease by 10 percent. By selling it at world prices, 
the country will receive around $15 billion. The current level 
of oil production can be supported using these funds for more 
than 3 years. 
  This information on the Energy Strategy will be of interest 
to every inhabitant of Russia. According to the calculations of 
the Russian Academy of Sciences' National Economic Forecasting 
Institute, each percentage point of energy savings produces a 
0.4 percent increase in the national income by the next year and 
approximately 0.1 percent annually in the next 2 decades. 
  Proper energy use is more efficient by a factor of 5 than 
energy-conservation expenditures. Energy savings will have a 
beneficial effect on the health of Russian citizens because, by 
the year 2000, the economical expenditure of energy will make it 
possible to reduce harmful discharges into the open air by 1.5 
million metric tons. 
  In addition to the purely economic and ecological benefits, 
the energy transformations include the further use of the 
powerful unifying potential of the federal power systems to 
maintain the integrity of Russia and to strengthen the mutual 
economic ties between the CIS countries. 
  The new efficient energy policy will combine the regions' 
natural yearning for self-sufficiency and self-management of the 
end energy resources (electricity and heat, motor fuel and 
domestic fuel) while maintaining the unity of Russia's energy 
complex as the most important factor of the economic and 
political integration of the country through the further 
development of the unified federal power systems (intersystem 
power transmissions and cross-country oil and gas pipelines) 
which ensure the reliability and viability of the energy supply 
for all the territories and the efficient use of the available 
unevenly distributed natural energy resources in the interests 
of all the regions and of the federation as a whole. 
  Provision has been made for improving existing interregional 
and intersectorial fuel and energy centers and establishing new 
ones using the shared assets of the territories with the state's 
participation (and the participation of other states) through 
the granting of preferential long-term credits and investments 
(KATEK, Yamalgazenergo [Yamal gas energy], the Timano-Pechora 
TEK and others). 
  The independent regional power companies supplying consumers 
with energy products produced locally both through acquired fuel 
and energy resources and through their own economical ones, 
including non-traditional types of energy, will find active 
support. 
  In the next 10-15 years, existing interregional and 
intersectorial fuel and energy centers will be improved and new 
ones will be established. The regions' interests will also be 
taken into account by the expansion of their share of ownership 
in the capital stock of the power installations while the unity 
of the technological management of the systems will be 
maintained by the appropriate federal state organs. 
  The regional energy policy will take into account the key 
differences in the conditions of the energy supply and the 
structure of the fuel and energy balance of such areas of the 
country as the northern, southern and central regions of 
Russia's European section, the Urals, Siberia, the Far East and 
the regions of the Far North. 
  The Energy Strategy differentiates the procedure for energy 
management in the center and locally. The federal state organs, 
using the directive procedure, exercise control over the 
activities of the federal power systems and nuclear power 
engineering; they manage the strategic reserves of energy 
resources; they develop the standards and norms for the safe and 
efficient operation of power installations and plants and the 
organization of state inspection for their observance; and they 
control the licensing of the foreign economic activities of TEK 
entities. 
  Under the joint jurisdiction of federal organs and entities 
of the Russian Federation are: the licensing of the activities 
of enterprises for the development of natural resource deposits, 
of enterprises operating as part of the federal power systems 
and also of nuclear energy installations; determination of the 
conditions for the licensing of the activities of energy 
enterprises responsible for a reliable fuel and energy supply 
for consumers and monitoring the observance of the issued 
licenses; and the organization of the energy supply under the 
conditions of emergency situations. 
  Under the exclusive jurisdiction of Russian Federation 
entities are: the procedure for the functioning of installations 
not part of the federal power systems; the issuing of licenses 
for the construction of new fuel and power installations and the 
expansion of existing ones and the allocation of land for them; 
and the adoption of additional requirements for the ecological 
safety and energy efficiency of installations situated on the 
territory under their jurisdiction. 
  The state organs do not interfere in the economic activities 
of energy enterprises, with the exception of the emergency 
situation conditions specified by legislation of the Russian 
Federation and its entities. 
  The requirements for the economic efficiency and 
competitiveness of Russia's energy enterprises in the domestic 
and foreign markets will lead to the large-scale reorganization 
of the TEK's production structure, to the extinction of certain 
old energy sources and to the development of new ones. During 
the drafting of the Energy Strategy, this complicated process 
was modeled on the specific participation of existing and new 
fuel and energy centers in domestic markets (for the country's 
regions), and in the markets of the near and far abroad. 
  Two qualitatively different stages stand out in the 
reorganization of power engineering's production structure. 
  In the first stage (the next 3-5 years), the competitiveness 
of Russian energy resources is determined not so much by new 
investment projects as by the ability of enterprises to adapt 
their own operating costs to the constantly changing market 
conditions inside Russia and to obtain quotas and licenses for 
entering foreign markets. During this period, the main thing is 
the survival of the energy enterprises under the conditions of 
the increasing non-payments, the acute lack of working capital 
and the progressive aging of fixed capital given the shortage of 
funds even for its repair and maintenance. Apparently, large 
associations like RAO Gazprom and RAO YeES Rossii [Unified Power 
System of Russia] will be able to endure this, but the fate of 
smaller associations and independent enterprises will depend 
entirely on the effectiveness of the government's measures for 
stabilizing the situation in the TEK. 
  Such measures should include: 
  -- overcoming the non-payment crisis through the paying off 
of state debts to the budget-controlled enterprises which are 
consumers of energy resources, the compulsory granting of credit 
for payment for the energy resources of bankrupt debtors and the 
improvement of the draft system of payment for energy resources, 
in particular, through their compulsory repayment using shares 
of the debtor enterprises; 
  -- gradually increasing the prices for energy resources 
until, in 1995-1996, they come into line with world prices; 
  -- establishing specialized investment funds at the disposal 
of joint-stock companies through deductions from the production 
cost of products with the right to use them only for capital 
investments in power engineering and energy conservation; 
  -- and establishing an insurance fund from TEK royalty 
payments for the social support of workers of idled or closed 
fuel and energy enterprises. 
  The successful functioning of the indicated crisis-solving 
measures and others will make it possible in the stage in 
question: 
  -- to ward off an incipient slump in gas production, to 
restore its pre-crisis level in 1995 and to increase steadily 
the production of gas in developed regions with the expansion of 
the throughput capacity of the existing gas pipelines and the 
building of a new export gas pipeline across Belarus and Poland 
into Central Europe; 
  -- to slow down and, in 1996-1997, to stop (at the level of 
280-330 million metric tons per year) the slump in the 
production of oil and condensate and to begin the renovation of 
the oil-refining industry with an increase in the extent of oil 
refining to 67 percent in 1997 and enhancement of the quality of 
petroleum products; 
  -- to stop by the end of the stage the overall slump in coal 
mining at the level of 270-280 million metric tons per year 
while continuing the structural reorganization of the sector in 
favor of open-pit coal mining in the country's eastern regions 
with a gradual controlled reduction in shaft mining and the 
closing of unprofitable enterprises; 
  -- to increase substantially the energy and economic 
efficiency of electric power engineering through the withdrawal 
from operation and the renovation of obsolete and worn-out 
equipment while increasing the proportion of the combined 
generation of electricity and heat and reducing, when electric 
consumption drops, basically the condensation generation of 
electricity; 
  -- to maintain the AESs' generation of electricity in 
regions 
where they are economically efficient while decreasing it in the 
rest of the regions in conformity with the reduction in electric 
consumption, proceeding on the basis of the competitiveness of 
the AESs with electric power plants using organic fuel; 
  -- and to stimulate the interest of consumers in the use of 
alternative energy sources, including non-traditional renewable 
ones. 
  The energy resource production dynamics proposed in the 
Energy Strategy will make it possible not just to supply 
completely Russia's domestic energy consumption, but also to 
increase somewhat the exporting of energy resources to the CIS 
countries and the far abroad while improving its structure in 
favor of the converted energy resources. 
  In the second stage (up to the end of the period in 
question), the improvement of the TEK's production structure 
will be ensured by the conditions of the competitiveness of 
Russian energy resources in the markets of the far and near 
abroad with the energy resources of other regions of the world 
and in domestic markets (for the country's regions), proceeding 
on the basis of the competition among the large fuel and energy 
joint-stock companies with one another and with local fuel and 
energy enterprises. 
<H5>  III. Science and Power Engineering </H5>
  Over the course of almost the last 50 years, nearly all 
the basic and applied scientific problems in the area of power 
engineering were solved by the forces of Russian science. For a 
number of directions, first and foremeost, those associated with 
the transmission of electricity over extremely long distances 
with high-voltage alternating and direct currents, with the 
establishment of new-generation, safe AESs, with the 
high-efficiency combined generation of electricity and heat, and 
with the extremely long-distance pumping of large amounts of 
natural gas through gas pipelines up to 1.4 meters in diameter, 
domestic developments are in no way inferior to the best world 
achievements. 
  At the same time, for other directions, including 
steam-and-gas and gas-turbine electric power plants, the 
solution of the ecological problems in electric power 
engineering, the reduction of non-production losses of 
electricity and heat during their transporting and distribution 
among end consumers and the automation of technological 
processes during the production of electricity and heat, Russian 
developments have lagged behind the leading foreign ones to one 
degree or another. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-22A>      Electricity Production in Billions of Kilowatt-Hours </FIG>


  The changes occurring in the country's social system and in 
economic relations have sharply reduced the opportunities for 
the state to finance scientific and technical progress from 
federal budget funds. But, at the same time, the state should 
retain for itself the important levels of determining influence 
on scientific and technical progress in power engineering. 
  In the next few years of the transition period, serious 
financial support of the most important directions of scientific 
and technical progress should be maintained through the use of 
state budget funds, ones like: 
  -- preserving the environment in the first stage and 
improving it in the next stage; 
  -- developing new, most promising and large energy sources 
which are of nationwide or interregional importance in nearly 
inaccessible regions with an undeveloped infrastructure, harsh 
climatic conditions and adverse mining and geological 
conditions: the shelves of the northern seas, the Yamal 
Peninsula and others; 
  -- large scientific and technical tasks in power 
engineering, 
the realization of which may be of limited nationwide 
importance, but the achievement of the final results for which 
is associated with great rick, because of which the commercial 
structures and sectors will not want to spend their own funds 
(thermonuclear power engineering, superconductivity, space-based 
power engineering, synthetic fuels and so on); 
  -- ensuring the safety of nuclear power engineering, 
establishing and developing new-generation nuclear power plants 
and localizing (eliminating) radioactive waste, first and 
foremost, the long-lived and most dangerous types; 
  -- developing technologies and equipment which will ensure 
the acceleration of oil and gas prospecting operations, a 
reduction in the time frames and the expenditures for the 
conversion of geological hydrocarbon resources into industrial 
reserves with an economic assessment of their development, 
mobile prospecting and surveying equipment suitable for use 
within the framework of small and medium-sized business in the 
area of the geological surveying of locally important, small 
hydrocarbon deposits; 
  -- and enhancing the efficiency of the transporting of 
natural gas over great distances, including by converting it 
into other types of energy resources. 
  The country's scientific and technical development should be 
geared toward the highest world standards and conform to them 
right away where this is possible and over time where this is 
difficult. 
  One necessary thing is the participation of Russian 
enterprises (companies) in the development of international 
projects which give them the right to make subsequent use of the 
knowledge accumulated through joint efforts. 
  The solving of applied scientific and technical problems 
with 
state financial support should henceforth be carried out 
basically within the framework of the state scientific and 
technical programs, Ecologically Clean Power Engineering and 
Progressive Technologies for the Integrated Development of the 
Fuel and Energy Resources of Russia's Mineral Deposits. Basic 
research in the sphere of power engineering should be conducted 
in accordance with the Russian Academy of Sciences' programs and 
plans. 
  Other directions of scientific and technical progress in the 
country's fuel and energy complex, as well as in the power 
engineering and electrical engineering industries, should be 
implemented within the framework of the sectorial programs 
financed from the assets of the budget funds of joint-stock 
companies, of non-budget funds, of commercial structures, and of 
individual interested companies, enterprises and organizations. 
At the same time, here as well, the state should retain for 
itself the possibility of exerting specific influence on the 
entire process of scientific and technical progress, especially 
in the initial state (in the next 2-3 years). 
  In electric power engineering, scientific research and 
development in the long run should be aimed, first and foremost, 
at increasing the reliability, safety and efficiency of the 
electric and heat supply while steadfastly maintaining the 
requirements for protection of the natural environment. In order 
to solve these problems, it is necessary to develop and to 
organize the production of equipment for using qualitatively new 
technologies. 
  First and foremost, scientific and technical progress in 
electric power engineering should be aimed at the development 
and widespread use within the country of steam-gas electric 
power plants which operate on natural gas and at the renovation 
of existing steam-turbine thermal electric power plants which 
operate on gas. During this same period, the feasibility of the 
industrial use of thermal electric power plants with solid-fuel 
fluidized-bed furnaces should be demonstrated and the work on 
increasing the level of safety of existing nuclear power plants 
should basically be completed. 
  Special units for cleaning sulfur oxides from flue gases 
should be developed by 1995-1997 and their installation begun at 
thermal electric power plants under construction. During the 
subsequent period, they should become widely used at existing 
thermal electric power plants. 
  During the period up to 1995, the development and testing of 
pilot models of wind-driven electric plants with unit capacities 
of 100 kilowatts and 250 kilowatts should be completed and 
series production begun of new-generation solar collectors, of 
amorphous-silicon photoelectric modules, of portable, 
self-contained photoelectric stations, of 
prefabricated-collapsible solar water-pumping units, of 
free-standing mini-hydroelectric power plants, and of other 
types of units which operate on non-traditional renewable energy 
sources, including geothermal, solar and biomass. In 1995, a set 
of operations should be performed in the area of hydrogen power 
engineering, the ecologically safe localization of radioactive 
waste and the production and use of a water-coal slurry for 
power-engineering purposes. Planned for 1995 are the manufacture 
and testing of a pilot model of highly economical electrolyzers 
with a solid polymer electrolyte and, in 1996, the placement 
into operation of an experimental industrial module of a 
plasma-chemical membrane process for producing hydrogen from 
sulfur-laden natural gas, of an experimental hydrogen power 
plant and so on. 
  In the mid-term plan (the period up to 2000-2003), the basic 
directions of scientific and technical progress should be the 
demonstration of the feasibility of the new generation of safe 
nuclear power reactors currently under development, of 
ecologically clean, solid-fuel thermal electric power plants, of 
high-efficiency photoelectric converters, of wind-driven power 
plants, and of technologies for the gasification of biomass. In 
1998, in particular, a pilot power-generating unit using 
Kansko-Achinsk coal with gradual burning of pre-heated coal dust 
and using cloth filters to trap ash and sulfur oxides should be 
built. Planned for the year 2000 is the placement into operation 
of a pilot steam-and-gas plant with a capacity of 300 megawatts, 
which operates on inferior-quality Donetsk anthracite culm, 
which is burned in a furnace with a circulating fluidized bed 
and equipped with an electrostatic precipitator with an 
alternating voltage. 
  Prior to the beginning of the next century, it is 
contemplated that the work on plans for a new generation of safe 
nuclear power plants will be completed and pilot power units 
with VVER-1000 [water-moderated water-cooled power reactor], 
VPBR-600 and VVER-500 reactors will be placed into operation. 
  The tasks of scientific and technical progress in the 
long-term plan (up to 2010) should be associated with the 
development of a new generation of safe nuclear power plants, 
including ones equipped with fast reactors, and the development 
of technologies for the safe localization (elimination) of 
long-lived and especially dangerous radioactive wastes. During 
the period up to 2010, the feasibility of the large-scale use of 
high-efficiency and inexpensive photoelectric converters and 
also of fuel cells with intracyclic gasification of coal should 
be demonstrated. By the same time frame, it is necessary to 
perform scientific research on the non-traditional concept of a 
nuclear plant with natural safety. 
  In the short-term and mid-term plans, a great deal of work 
must be done on increasing the technical level of the country's 
heating industry. Solid-fuel boiler plants should be equipped 
with low- and medium-capacity boilers with fluidized-bed 
furnaces and ones with a circulating fluidized bed, as well as 
ones which operate on a water-coal slurry. It is necessary to 
develop gas-cleaning systems for them, including ones not just 
for trapping ash, but also, when need be, for removing sulfur 
and nitrogen. 
  For small and medium-sized consumers, including widely 
scattered ones, self-contained mini-TETss [heat and power 
plants] or heat-generating plants, as well as various types of 
heat-pumping plants, are needed. 
  Future heat sources should be reliable, mechanized and 
automated, manufactured as complete sets at the plants (or 
consist of manufactured units) and be safe and ecologically 
clean so that they could be installed at the consumers' places 
(or in consumption centers). 
  New methods, technologies and equipment will be introduced 
for prospecting for and surveying oil fields, including 
deep-seated horizons, unmapped traps, high-viscosity oils, 
natural bitumens, low-permeability reservoirs, gas condensate 
and natural gas in order to increase the resource supply of the 
country's oil and gas complex and the number of proven 
recoverable reserves of hydrocarbon raw material. It will still 
be necessary to increase labor productivity seriously at 
drilling operations through the development over the course of 
1994-1997 of new methods for crushing the mined rock. 
  Work is supposed to be completed not later than 1996 on the 
development of promising technologies for extracting 
hydrocarbons from the mineral sites, on the effect of vibration 
waves and electrohydraulics on deposits, on increasing the 
pools' oil yield and on increasing the capacity of oil 
production by using ecologically safe biotechnologies and 
biopolymers. 
  Needed are the development of equipment and technologies 
which ensure an increase in the degree of use of petroleum gas 
up to 91-95 percent as opposed to 74-75 percent at present, an 
increase in the production, from natural and petroleum gas, of 
long distillate of light hydrocarbons and condensed gas by a 
factor of 2-3 and of ethane by a factor of 8-10; and the 
formation of integrated gas-processing plants which ensure 
efficient use of hydrocarbon raw material and non-hydrocarbon 
components (sulfur, helium, carbon dioxide and nitrogen) of 
natural and petroleum gas. 
  Provision has been made for the widespread introduction of 
progressive technologies and new types of oil-industry and 
repair equipment for increasing efficiency in opening up 
productive pools by 10-15 percent while developing oil, gas and 
gas condensate fields, increasing by 3-4 percentage points the 
mean-time-between-repairs period for the operation of wells and 
reducing by a factor of 1.5-1.7 the labor-intensiveness of oil 
production. 
  The annual productivity of a drilling rig will be increased 
by a factor of 1.8-2 and the productivity and 
labor-intensiveness of well construction by a factor of 1.5-2.2. 
  Technologies and equipment should be developed, which ensure 
the thorough extraction of valuable components from gas and the 
efficient use of crude gas, which will make it possible to 
satisfy the growing needs of the national economy for long 
distillate of light hydrocarbons, sulfur, helium motor fuel and 
raw material for the production of plastics. 
  Serious problems must be solved in the area of gas 
transporting. A large scientific and production problem is 
maintaining the system of cross-country pipeline transport in 
working condition. 
  In order to reduce the energy-intensiveness of gas 
transporting by 20-25 percent and to reduce labor-intensiveness 
by a factor of 2-2.5, it is necessary to develop and to 
introduce automated GPAs [gas-pumping units] with an efficiency 
of 35-36 percent (in particular, through the use of regenerators 
with a high degree of regeneration -- 81-87 percent). 
  The prospects for hydrocarbon production are associated with 
the development of oil and gas fields on the continental shelf. 
First and foremost, technologies and equipment will be developed 
and placed into service for fields: 
  -- in shallow-water areas -- with a sea depth of down to 20 
meters (the Kruzenshternovskiy and Kharasaveyskiy gas-condensate 
fields in the coastal area of the Yamal Peninsula, the 
Prirazlomnyy oil field in the region of the Pechora Bay and 
others); 
  -- and in areas with a sea depth of down to 50-150 meters 
(the Leningradskiy and Rusanovskiy gas-condensate fields in the 
Kara Sea and others). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-25A>      Oil Refining and the Production of Petroleum Products in Millions of Metric Tons </FIG>

  Using the resources of the conversion sectors and industrial 
cooperation with leading foreign firms, developed and placed 
into service in production will be highly efficient systems and 
equipment for conducting off-shore geophysical and 
engineering-geological operations, modern equipment for drilling 
off-shore wells down to 6,500 meters deep, and reliable 
equipment for field facilities for producing and preparing for 
transport oil and gas from off-shore fields, including a unique 
ice-resistant deep-sea platform for a sea depth down to 400 
meters. 
  In the coal industry, enhancement of productivity and safety 
and improvement of working conditions during the mining, 
preparation and processing of coal will be achieved by the 
development and placement into service during the period up to 
the year 2000 of technologies and equipment which permit: an 
increase in the level of mechanization of the mining of coal 
seams using shortwalls in complicated mining-and-geological 
conditions, the mining of coal from steep seams using hydraulic 
mining, the working of flat coal seams leaving the rock 
completely in the mine shaft and of highly-gaseous flat seams 
using inert means; non-traditional underground coal mining and 
the removal of coal seams using the hydraulic pulse method; 
underground coal mining using physico-chemical, vibration-pulse 
and other actions on the coal seam; the ecologically clean 
preparation of coal and the transporting and burning of 
water-coal slurry. 
  Among the most important intersectorial scientific and 
technical problems, the solving of which is necessary for 
enhancing the technical level of power engineering, are: 
  -- systematic investigation of the interconnection between 
socio-economic progress and the development of the energy 
industry and substantiation of the strategies for the 
development of Russia's fuel and energy complex as part of the 
world energy industry; 
  -- studying the impact of the energy industry on the 
environment on local, regional and global levels, increasing the 
trustworthiness of the predictions of global changes in climate 
and investigating the possibilities for preventing them or 
adapting to them; 
  -- of the prediction of the development of equipment and 
technologies of the future in the area of the production, 
conversion and use of fuel and energy resources for the 
formation of long-term programs and plans and of the 
organization of specific anticipatory scientific research; 
  -- of hydrodynamics and gas dynamics, of heat exchange and 
mass transfer, of burning and other chemical transformations 
with respect to processes which occur in energy and 
environmental protection equipment (for its designing and 
operation); 
  -- the strength and properties of materials used in power 
engineering and the development of new, promising materials; 
  -- thermonuclear fusion; 
  -- and information science and materials and principles for 
the development of equipment and automation systems which 
provide the basis for scientific and technical progress in power 
engineering. 
<H5>  IV. Means and Mechanisms of the Energy Policy </H5>
  The rapid entry of Russia into the market assumed a 
slowing down of the inflation rate and the production slump. 
However, the purely monetaristic approach proved to be futile, 
because, without proper social protection of the populace during 
the reform period, it only aggravated the crisis events in the 
economy and it began to drag Russia into the trap of delayed 
development. Purposefully continuing a policy of intensification 
of the reforms, at the same time, the Russian Government is 
changing the reformist tactics on the run. Especially since, due 
to a number of reasons, there emerged a real prospect of 
exhausting the raw material, finished material and labor 
foundations of the economy. 
  In this complicated situation, the reformers' eyes have 
again 
turned to the fuel and energy complex. After all, according to 
the data of the Russian Academy of Sciences' Central 
Economic-Mathematics Institute, around two-thirds of the profit 
created in the material production sectors is accumulating in it 
and, for good reason, in the Energy Strategy, it is being 
assigned the role of a unique locomotive for the economic 
transformations. In looking for means and mechanisms which, 
figuratively speaking, would set this locomotive going at full 
speed, the drafters of the prospective directions for developing 
power engineering came to the conclusion that, during the reform 
era, in view of the sector's special features and with due 
consideration of the world experience, combining the methods of 
direct state regulation of power engineering with the active 
formation of a state-controlled energy market is the most 
acceptable. 
  State regulation of power engineering will be accomplished 
through the selection of vitally important directions for the 
TEK's development and selectively supporting them, developing 
them and providing purposeful federal investment programs, 
especially programs promoting energy conservation and scientific 
and technical progress and the development of ecologically safe 
and non-traditional energy sources. 
  The state recognizes and guarantees the equal rights of all 
types of ownership of the property and products of the fuel and 
energy complex for the purposes of eliminating the 
monopolization of energy production and the energy supply, 
reducing the cost of fuel and energy for consumers and creating 
a strong economy. 
  The state is shaping the energy market using price and tax 
policies which ensure the elimination of the distortions of the 
prices for energy resources and other fuels. The transition to 
reasonable fuel prices will be constantly guided by the world 
market prices and will ensure a reduction of taxes on the 
processing industry and the service sphere through royalty 
payments and taxes on the excess profits of fuel enterprises. A 
subsequent policy for forming a competitive environment in power 
engineering will be pursued through the establishment of 
valuable economic market entities and a market infrastructure. 
There will be improved laws and an adequately complete system of 
standard acts regulating the mutual relations of the market 
entities with one another, with the organs of state management 
and with the public, as well as a set of incentives and 
conditions for energy conservation. An active investment policy 
will be pursued through the creation of conditions for the 
self-financing of fuel and energy enterprises and the expansion 
of the circle of investors while capital investments from the 
budget will be minimized. 
  Let us examine these means and mechanisms of the new Energy 
Strategy in more detail. 
  The price and tax policies pursued by the state will be 
aimed 
at a gradual transition to price parity for the basic groups of 
goods: industrial products, consumer goods and energy resources 
with due consideration of the level of wages and other incomes 
of the citizenry. 
  The upper limit of domestic wholesale prices for energy 
resources will be the level of world prices with due 
consideration of the corresponding ruble exchange rate, as well 
as of the costs for transporting and selling the energy 
resources. 
  The lower limit of the control range of prices will be 
determined by the cost of the "strenuous self-financing" of the 
energy enterprises, one which ensures that they do not operate 
at a loss (with the partial exception of coal mining) and 
ensures the needed investment amount for retooling and 
development and for deriving an adequate profit. 
  Artificially supporting prices below this level, maintaining 
the economy's energy-wasting nature, would require enormous 
budget subsidies for supporting the TEK (around 100 million 
rubles annually), which would lead to the additional taxation of 
other sectors of the economy. Thus, the state will no longer 
subsidize the TEK. 
  Within the boundaries of the designated price limits, the 
state will pursue a policy of differentiated price setting for 
individual energy resources, taking into account their consumer 
value and the energy producers' monopoly, being guided by the 
following principles; 
  -- prices for non-monopolized types of energy resources: for 
oil and petroleum products, steaming coal and local types of 
fuel which are not technologically irreplaceable for consumers 
should be unregulated; 
  -- delivery conditions and wholesale prices should be 
regulated for irreplaceable types of fuel and energy: coking 
coal and coke for metallurgy, steaming coal, peat, shale, 
natural and incidental gases for consumers outside the Unified 
Gas-Supply System's coverage area. These prices are set based on 
a contract between the energy product supplier and the energy 
consumer under arbitration control on the part of the regional 
power commissions; 
  -- prices for electricity and heat from centralized sources 
should be established by the regional power commissions; 
  -- prices for piped natural gas in the coverage area of the 
Unified Gas-Supply System's "natural" monopoly, as well as for 
condensed gas and electricity for the public, will be 
established by the state at the federal level. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-27A>      Structure of Centralized Heating (2000 AD) in Millions of Gigacalories </FIG>


  Prices for gas, taking into account its consumer value, 
should not be lower than the prices for fuel oil, steaming coal 
and other boiler and furnace fuel for consumers in an area where 
energy resources are interchangeable. 
  State regulation of energy resource prices will limit the 
energy enterprises' level of profitability. A progressive tax on 
excess profits in the fuel sectors, especially in the gas and 
oil sectors, as well as an increase in the share of the royalty 
component in the price for natural energy resources as payments 
for the mineral resources, will make it possible to reduce 
gradually the taxes on profit and value added in the processing 
industry. 
  Indirect regulation of prices for oil and petroleum products 
will also be carried out by means of customs duties on their 
exporting. 
  Selective protectionism for energy-intensive enterprises 
vitally important for the country's economy and defense will 
become an integral part of the state's price and tax policies. 
  The formation of a competitive environment in the TEK is 
aimed at reducing production costs and the cost of fuel and 
energy and enhancing the quality of energy services rendered to 
the consumer. It will be carried out mainly through the 
denationalization of TEK enterprises, primarily through 
conversion to joint-stock companies. 
  For the purposes of consolidating the interests of federal 
and regional structures, energy resource producers and 
consumers, TEK enterprises and related industries (machine 
building, metallurgy, the construction complex and others), the 
state will encourage the establishment of mixed joint-stock 
companies with proportional participation of all the interested 
structures, including foreign partners as well. To this end, the 
participation of Russian structures in the conversion of TEK 
enterprises and related sectors in CIS countries and other 
foreign states to joint-stock companies will also be encouraged. 
  As market relations develop, the privatization of existing 
TEK enterprises, carried out in conformity with federal and 
regional privatization programs, and the establishment of new 
private and joint-stock structures will be of ever greater 
importance. 
  At the same time, the state, through the Russian 
Mintopenergo 
[Ministry of Fuel and Energy], exercises control over the 
efficiency of the use of production funds and natural resources 
in the energy complex regardless of the forms of ownership of 
the managing entities. 
  By granting specific advantages to small and medium-sized 
business, the state will simultaneously encourage the formation 
of large, integrated power companies encompassing the various 
stages of the production, conversion and distribution of energy 
resources and will render support to the forming of 
transregional structures, especially oil and gas ones, which 
provide an entry for Russian capital into the world market. 
  Along with the establishment of economic structures right in 
the TEK sectors, the state ensures the formation of the 
corresponding enterprises and organizations of the market 
infrastructures (banks, exchanges, insurance innovation 
companies, consulting, marketing and forecasting firms and 
others). 
  During the conversion to joint-stock companies and the 
privatization of TEK enterprises, the state will not permit the 
establishment of new monopoly structures in the sphere of the 
fuel and energy supply, ensuring at the same time that the unity 
of technologically associated enterprises is maintained. 
  As a result of denationalization, conditions will be created 
for fuel and energy consumers for selecting the most 
advantageous energy suppliers, who will be competing among 
themselves in the domestic market. 
  The Energy Strategy provides for the promotion of investment 
processes. It will be achieved, first and foremost, through the 
creation of favorable fiscal and economic conditions for the 
self-financing of TEK enterprises while society's costs for the 
energy supply are minimized (thanks to competition). 
  To this end, the practice of using accelerated depreciation 
of capital stock will be introduced, the procedures of which 
will be regulated precisely. 
  In view of the limited opportunities of the investment 
complex during the transition period, the state, first of all, 
will create favorable conditions for concentrating the efforts 
of the machine-building industries and the construction and 
installation organizations in the direction of massive retooling 
of the existing TEK enterprises (tax breaks and preferential 
investment credits). This will ensure a reduction in the time 
frames for modernization and will make it possible to increase 
the needed construction starts for new energy installations. 
  The priority given to the widespread retooling of TEK 
enterprises will be maintained up to the year 2000. 
  At the same time, the construction will be continued, in 
optimum proportions, of new energy capacities needed, including 
those for maintaining the scientific, technical and skill 
potential of the related sectors of domestic machine building, 
metallurgy and the construction base. Maintaining and developing 
this potential will make it possible to ensure proper 
development of the TEK and the entire Russian economy. 
  In order to develop new production capacities and large 
deposits of energy resources, the state will encourage the 
expansion of the circle of investors in the TEK through the 
accumulation of the funds of domestic and foreign consumers of 
fuel and energy and of the public through the establishment of 
non-budget-controlled and special-purpose federal sectorial and 
regional funds and investment companies. 
  The attracting of investors of other forms of ownership in 
order to finance state programs on terms economically attractive 
for them will become the state's primary task. 
  The basic forms of state incentives for and assistance 
rendered to non-state investors in the realization of these 
programs will be: 
  -- the direct proportional participation of the state in the 
development of industries needed by society and, in particular, 
the granting of up to 25-40 percent of the preferential state 
investment credit to the private investor or direct state 
capital investments; 
  -- the full or partial exemption of these investors from the 
capital investments tax and the value-added tax; 
  -- and a tax exemption during the first 3-4 years of 
operation of new enterprises and industries. 
  Based on the extent of the development of market relations, 
the relationship between the three basic sources of financing of 
investments in the TEK will also change; the role of budget 
resources will decrease, while the share of the financial 
resources of the TEK enterprises and outside resources will 
increase. Roughly speaking, the share of the latter two may 
reach 70-80 percent by the end of the period in question. 
  In all instances, the centralized investment resources will 
be allocated based on the principles of return, efficiency and 
special-purpose use. 
  With the exception of special instances, the state 
guarantees 
various investment opportunities for domestic and foreign 
investors. 
  The set of incentives and conditions for energy conservation 
and increasing efficiency in the use of energy is necessary for 
the realization of the enormous potential of energy savings in 
Russia --around 500 million metric tons of equivalent fuel or 40 
percent of the current energy consumption. Depending on the 
intensity of energy conservation, Russia's need for energy may 
either double or remain at the existing level right up to 2010 
with a twofold increase in the standard of living for the 
country's populace. 
  The world experience of the last few decades has shown that 
intensification of energy conservation is impossible without a 
repeated increase in energy prices. The new price policy 
provides that domestic prices should come radically closer to 
world prices and thereby create the main incentive for energy 
savings. 
  But that same world experience testifies to the inadequacy 
of 
just price incentives for the pursuit of an effective 
energy-conserving policy. Needed are additional economic and 
purely standard measures, as well as a lot of informational and 
promotional work so that energy conservation would replace 
energy wastefulness as the overall living style of society. A 
correct price policy and the capable use of the entire set of 
named measures will make it possible, by the year 2000, to 
realize no less than half of the available energy conservation 
potential and to use it fully within economically efficient 
limits by 2007-2010. 
  Being drafted and put together is a Russian Energy Code, a 
new set of standard and legislative acts. Its basic document 
will be the Russian Federation Law on a Fundamental Federal 
Energy Policy (Fundamental Legislation), in which the authority 
and responsibility of the federal and regional organs in matters 
of the shaping and realization of the Energy Strategy will be 
defined precisely, the role of the state in the development and 
management of the TEK will be spelled out and the basic statutes 
on the energy market will be defined. 
  The set of acts will include the laws: 
  -- on mineral resources, 
  -- on oil and gas, 
  -- on energy conservation and the efficient use of fuel and 
energy, 
  -- on electric power engineering, 
  -- on the use of nuclear energy, 
  -- on the use of non-traditional types of energy, 
  -- on the ecological safety of TEK installations, 
  -- on labor protection and safety in the coal industry and 
others. 
  Needed in addition to the Energy Code are refinement and 
adjustment of the general economic legislation with respect to 
the special features of the TEK's activities. 
  The individual standard decisions, which reinforce the 
Strategy's statutes and mechanisms, in conformity with the 
authority provided by the Federative Agreement, will be adopted 
by edicts of the Russian President, decrees of the Russian 
Government and legislative acts of the Russian Federation's 
entities. 
<H5>  V. Russia's Energy Balance </H5>
  The opportunities for the development of the fuel and 
energy sectors have been shaped on the condition that the needs 
for basic energy resources for Russia's regions, as well as the 
exporting needs, will be satisfied. 
  The oil production forecasts for the short term are being 
determined by the time frames for overcoming the investment 
crisis and the shortage of equipment (which is directly 
associated with the real liberalization of petroleum product 
prices and the creation of a favorable climate for foreign 
investments), while those for the long term are being determined 
by the competitiveness of Russian oil in the world market, which 
depends, in particular, on the dynamics of the world oil prices. 
  The most optimistic forecasts for the development of oil and 
condensate production foresee an end to its decrease in 1995 
(315 million metric tons) with a subsequent increase up to 325 
million metric tons by 2000 and 340 million metric tons by 2010 
-- proceeding based on the efficiency of Russian oil given the 
high levels of world prices. More restrained assessments predict 
a continuation of the oil production slump until 1996 (280 
million metric tons), a moderate increase by 2000 (up to 310 
million metric tons) and a small increase with subsequent 
stabilization at a relatively low level (320 million metric 
tons) until the end of the period in question -- in the instance 
of low world oil prices. 
  Liquid distillates obtained during the production and 
processing of natural gas will make a larger and larger 
contribution to Russia's oil balance, while the national 
economy's motor fuel supply will be obtained to an ever greater 
extent through the intensification of oil refining. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-30A>      Natural Gas Exporting in Billions of Cubic Meters </FIG>


  The dynamics of coal mining up to the start of the next 
century will be determined by the degree of success in the 
formation of new economic and fiscal relations in this sector. A 
key question will be the level of the state-regulated prices for 
natural gas -- coal's basic competitor among the greater portion 
of consumers. If the policy followed up till now of artificially 
understating gas prices is maintained for several more years, 
then the coal industry in the overwhelming majority of Russia's 
regions will not be able to exist without large state subsidies, 
i.e., it will be doomed to a low level of efficiency and, 
consequently, a continuing production slump with a "postponed" 
increase in unemployment and a heightening of social tension. 
Coal mining in the country, based on this version, will decrease 
to 300 million metric tons in 1996 and will increase to a mere 
310 million metric tons by 2000. 
  If, however, gas prices are rapidly brought into line with 
world prices within the framework of a financial stabilization 
policy, then, the market prices for coal will rise 
correspondingly and the majority of coal enterprises will be 
able to provide the necessary self-financing of investments in 
the renovation and development of production. This will make it 
possible, by 1995, to stabilize and then to increase coal mining 
up to 320 million metric tons by 2000. 
  The subsequent dynamics of coal mining will, to a 
significant 
extent, be determined by the successes in the development of 
ecologically acceptable technologies for using coal and 
developing the Kansko-Achinsk Coal Basin. Decisive here, as 
before, is the matter of coal's competitiveness with natural 
gas, but, because of the ecological problems' importance, it 
will be perceived through the pace of the development of new 
technologies for mining and using coal. Given the successful 
development of domestic technologies or the large-scale use of 
foreign technologies, coal mining may increase up to 345 million 
metric tons in 2010 (the high version). If these processes are 
delayed, large-scale development of the Kansko-Achinsk Basin 
will go beyond the limits of the period in question and coal 
mining in 2010 will not exceed 325 million metric tons. 
  Gas prices will also determine to a significant extent the 
prospects for developing nuclear power engineering. The total 
capacity of the AESs, after its decrease to 15-17 gigawatts in 
1997-1999, will then increase by 2010 up to 30-33 gigawatts in 
the optimistic version of the development of nuclear power 
engineering and up to 22-24 gigawatts in the moderate version. 
  The use of renewable energy sources -- traditional (water 
power and wood) and non-traditional -- will increase throughout 
the entire period in question, reaching 100 million metric tons 
of equivalent fuel by 2010 in the optimistic version and 65 
million metric tons of equivalent fuel in the moderate version. 
But, in all instances, these energy sources, just like nuclear 
energy, will not be able to exert decisive influence on the 
stability and efficiency in meeting the country's domestic needs 
for energy and the exporting needs. 
  The gas industry will be the main means for solving these 
problems throughout the entire period in question. Based on the 
results of the optimization of Russia's energy balance 
regionally, the needed volumes of gas production amount to 
650-655 billion cubic meters in 1995, 715-730 billion cubic 
meters in 2000 and 785-820 billion cubic meters in 2010. At the 
same time, the development of the gas industry is in line with 
the traditional directions for the gasification of the national 
economy. Under the new conditions, a policy of more intensive 
gasification of the national economy with the development of new 
markets for natural gas and an increase in the efficient use of 
gas among traditional consumers is economically justified and 
should be pursued. 
  Electric power engineering is the heart of Russia's energy 
complex, meeting the needs of the national economy with the most 
ecologically clean and adptable energy resource. Electricity 
production in Russia, after dropping to 940 billion 
kilowatt-hours in 1995-1996, will increase up to 1,040-1,050 
billion kilowatt-hours in 2000 and up to 1,270-1,300 billion 
kilowatt-hours in 2010. It is precisely in electric power 
engineering that there will be the fullest realization of the 
interchangeability and competition of all types of fuel (its 
expenditure will decrease from 370 million metric tons of 
equivalent fuel in 1992 to 345 million metric tons of equivalent 
fuel in 1995, then be restored by 2000 and increase up to 
415-420 million metric tons of equivalent fuel by 2010) among 
one another and with other energy resources -- nuclear energy 
and water power and non-traditional energy sources. 
  The national economy's centralized heating specifically for 
Russia's energy complex also performs in it the same integrating 
functions as electric power engineering. Determining the 
efficient levels for centralizing the heat supply (while a 
market economy creates additional incentives for 
decentralization) and efficient scales for power and heat 
generation (the combined production of heat and electricity) has 
become the main task of the optimization of the national 
economy's heat supply. 
  Inasmuch as more than 35 percent of all the energy resources 
consumed in Russia goes for heating needs, then another task 
(closely associated with the stated ones) is the selection of 
optimum combinations in using the various types of fuel and 
nuclear and non-traditional energy sources for heating needs. 
  Thus, the new structural policy for energy resource 
production for the next 15-20 years envisions keeping organic 
fuel as the foundation of Russia's fuel and energy balance. 
<H5>  VI. Russian Energy Diplomacy </H5>
  The TEK's most important task is restoring its 
positions in the world energy market, in volumes which meet the 
objective efficiency of Russian energy resources, and raising 
the country's economy and the prosperity of the populace. 
  Doing this will be very complicated after the loss of the 
oil 
markets and part of the gas markets in the countries of Eastern 
Europe and the Baltics because of the decrease in world oil 
prices and the strong competition in the European gas markets. 
  The analysis of and forecast for the energy markets of 
Europe 
and the Far East show that, in the foreseeable future, the 
exporting of energy resources from Russia will not exceed 85 
percent of the maximum 1988 level given a scenario of low energy 
consumption and 65 percent given an enhanced scenario. 
  In contrast to the USSR, which was the world's largest 
exporter of energy resources, but which used the enormous 
currency revenues to support military confrontation under the 
conditions of a "closed" economy, Russia should promote to the 
maximum extent the integration of the domestic economy into 
world economic relations. 
  On the one hand, this signifies a need to reconcile domestic 
and world prices for energy resources and other types of 
products (and, of course, the wage levels) and, on the other 
hand, opportunities for the widespread access of foreign 
investments (together with technologies and methods for 
organizing operations) to the development of our energy 
resources, including for the needs of exporting. 
  Both these features will radically change the attitude 
toward 
the assessment of the efficiency of exporting projects, 
replacing the former policy of "obtaining currency at any price 
" with careful economic bases for each project, regardless of 
the extent to which its products go for exporting. 
  In this way, real economic obstacles to the squandering of 
Russia's natural resources will be set up, instead of paper 
obstacles. 
  Forecasting efficient scales for energy resource exporting 
requires a careful analysis of Russia's possible role in the 
basic energy markets. 
  In the world oil market, even during the years of its 
largest 
exporting (more than 200 million metric tons in 1988), the USSR 
did not manage to have a serious influence on the economic 
market conditions. Moreover, this will be hard to do for Russia, 
which will not be able to distribute beyond the borders of the 
CIS more than 60-70 million metric tons of oil and petroleum 
products right up to the year 2000 and up to 100 million metric 
tons during the subsequent period. 
  This is why, given the forecast for the effective volumes of 
Russian oil's participation in the world market, it is possible 
to consider its capacity within the stated limits to be 
unlimited and the price of oil as not depending on the amounts 
of Russian exporting. 
  As a consequence of an increase in the world prices for oil 
and, what is the main thing, the shift to trading energy 
resources with the CIS countries at world prices, the earnings 
from exporting Russian oil may reach the 1990 level by 1995 and 
exceed it by 10-75 percent in 2000 and by a factor of 1.6-2.8 by 
2010. 
  The net profit of Russian enterprises and the state (through 
taxes, royalty payments and customs fees) from oil exporting, 
defined as the difference between the earnings from its sale at 
world prices and the production expenditures (capital and 
current), is estimated to be $20-35 billion in 1996-2000 and 
$70-100 billion in the next decade. 
  In the world gas markets, in contrast to the oil market, 
Russia can and should play an active role. By providing 35 
percent of the world exporting of natural gas, Russia will have 
substantial influence on the market conditions of the European 
market and establish a Far East market for pipeline gas. The 
opportunities for Russia's entry into the world market for 
condensed natural gas (SPG) also need to be studied. 
  Forecasts of the World Energy Council, the European Energy 
Agency and other international organizations envision an 
increase in the share of natural gas in the consumption of 
primary energy resources in Europe in the first few decades of 
the 21st Century up to 22 percent. The possibilities of 
satisfying Europe's demand for natural gas using domestic 
production will decrease by 2010 from 66 percent to 44 percent. 
Russia's basic "internal" competitors in the European market are 
Norway and the Netherlands, while, over time, the role of the 
former will nearly double and that of the latter will be cut in 
half. The promotion of Norwegian gas to the European market is 
being carried out by the state and monopolistic structures of 
Western Europe for both economic and political considerations, 
restraining the entry of Russian gas into this market. 
Nevertheless, the volumes of gas production at Norway's new 
fields can be viewed as a target for competition from and 
replacement by Russian gas. 
  Of the natural gas deliveries which are "external" for 
Europe, a notable role is played by Algeria's gas, the exporting 
of which is increasing for existing and new contracts and may, 
in the future, reach 80-90 billion cubic meters per year, but a 
large portion of this volume does not enter the area of 
competition of Russian gas. 
  Iran, which has the largest gas resources after the CIS, is 
also contemplating beginning exporting gas to Europe. This 
assumes the construction of gas pipelines across the territory 
of Turkey or Ukraine. Russian gas will be the main competitor 
for Iranian gas. 
  During the period in question, it is possible that Nigeria 
and Qatar, where large gas fields have been discovered, will 
join the number of exporters of gas to the European market. They 
are contemplating exporting the gas in condensed form primarily 
to Mediterranean ports and probably will not be competing with 
Russian gas. 
  In the opinion of Western specialists, it is possible to be 
quite certain that existing Russian contracts will be renewed, 
although ensuring the conditions required for the Russian side 
presents a serious problem. 
  In the future, basic competition in the European market will 
be associated with the entry of "new" gas from Siberia (in 
particular, from the Yamal fields) and the Shtokmanskiy Field. 
This gas will be competing mainly with Norway's "new" gas and 
may become reserved for all of European importing. 
  In the Far East region, the gas resources of Eastern Siberia 
and Russia's Far East will make it possible to study the idea of 
establishing a system of gas pipelines into China, North Korea, 
South Korea and, possibly, to Japan. 
  According to the assessments of the MMMShM Consortium 
[McDermott, Mitsui, Mitsubishi, Shell and Marathon], given the 
specified conditions, developing the Lunskiy and 
Piltun-Astokhskiy fields on the shelf of Sakhalin Island is 
economically justified both for Russia and for foreign 
investors. At the same time, the price FOB-Sakhalin is being set 
at $120-140 per thousand cubic meters (after liquefaction -- for 
transportation to Japan). There is a variation using Sakhalin 
gas over a system of cross-country gas pipelines into China, 
North Korea and South Korea. 
  Other planned developments contemplate establishing a system 
of gas pipelines through Khabarovsk from the gas fields of the 
Republic of Sakha-Yakutia or Irkutsk Oblast. With a feed of 16 
billion cubic meters of Yakut gas per year, its price in North 
Korea may amount to $110-130 per thousand cubic meters. All 
these technical and economic developments need refinement and 
serious examination. 
  The exporting of other energy resources from Russia -- 
electricity, coal and products from its processing and other 
types of fuel -- will not play as important a role as 
hydrocarbon exporting. Nevertheless, it is possible to talk 
about very large volumes. In addition, the exporting of 
electricity, especially to CIS countries and to the European 
countries, will be of essential importance from the standpoint 
of preserving the advantages of the Unified Electricity System 
on the territory of the former USSR and the former "Mir" Power 
System on a new economic basis and in the new political 
situation, as well as their expansion through the integration of 
the power systems of Western and Eastern Europe. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-042-33A>      Total Oil and Petroleum Product Exporting in Millions of Metric Tons </FIG>


  Total earnings from energy resource exporting will amount to 
$30-45 billion in 1995 and $35-55 billion in 2000. Over the 
upcoming 7-year period (up to 2000), this will ensure the 
receipt of from $230 billion to $330 billion, i.e., 3-4 times 
more than the former USSR's foreign debt, the repayment of which 
Russia has taken upon itself. 
  The profit from the exporting of energy resources from 
Russia 
will come to from 40 percent to 55 percent of the total amount 
of earnings, which, in and of themselves, will amount during the 
upcoming 7 years to 5-10 percent of the national income. Taking 
into account the positive changes in the economy's structure, 
which have been caused by the use of the advantages of the 
international division of labor, the proposed energy resource 
exporting policy will ensure an increase in the national income 
by 5-7 percent by 2000 and by another 8-12 percent by 2010. 
<H5>  VII. Ecological Safety and Developing Power Engineering </H5>
  The development of the fuel and energy complex should 
be ensured with strict observance of the environmental 
protection requirements. Inasmuch as its installations are the 
basic sources of pollution of the air and the surface and 
underground waters and the disturbance of natural landscapes and 
lands, the TEK should take upon itself the basic burden of 
solving the most important social problem --the ecological 
improvement of the country. The realization of this task will 
require significant material and financial resources and an 
integrated approach to developing and operating all the TEK's 
units. 
  Around 48 percent of the discharges of harmful substances 
into the open air, up to 36 percent of the draining of waste 
water into natural water reservoirs (including 15 percent of 
that polluted above the norm) and more than 30 percent of the 
solid wastes which occupy significant storage areas must be 
attributed to the fuel and energy enterprises. 
  The basic principle for ensuring ecological safety in the 
TEK 
will be an integrated approach to efficient fuel and energy 
resource use and conservation at all stages of their production, 
processing and consumption on the basis of progressive and 
ecologically clean technologies, including the operation of 
unified power-generating units. 
  At the same time, the output of products produced in the TEK 
is being increased, ones used as ecologically clean energy 
resources in other sectors of the national economy (low-sulfur 
fuel, high-octane unleaded gasoline, binary types of fuel, 
briquet for domestic purposes and the like). 
  A significant role in reducing environmental pollution is 
being assigned to the optimization of the fuel and energy 
balance intertwined with the structure and the placement of 
other production capacities which are sources of discharges of 
harmful substances, as well as to increasing the proportion of 
centralized heating of industrial and social installations. 
Using new furnaces and ecologically clean methods for producing 
energy will reduce the harmful impact on the environment. 
  There will be substantial improvement of the system for 
collecting, transporting and processing incidental gaseous 
products, as well as the detection, localization and elimination 
of oil leaks and spills in the producing and refining regions, 
especially under the ecologically strenuous conditions of the 
North. 
  Taking into consideration the objective orientation toward 
the preferential use of coal fuel in power engineering, the use 
of ecologically clean technologies for its mining, transporting 
and processing with compulsory use of waste material, 
reclamation of disturbed lands and restoration of the ecosystems 
is being expanded. 
  The most important strategic tasks are still the 
organization 
of integrated monitoring of the state of the environment at TEK 
installations, as well as the improvement and development of the 
legal, standard and technical base regulating the planning, 
construction, operation and removal from operation of TEK 
installations. 
  The realization of the examined directions of the 
environmental protection policy, based on forecast estimates, 
should ensure by 2010, just in electric power engineering and 
centralized heating: 
  -- a reduction by 30-40 percent in the discharges of acidic 
gases and ash into the open air; 
  -- the practical stabilization of discharges of greenhouse 
gases into the open air; 
  -- the cessation of harmful discharges; 
  -- and the almost complete stopping of the increase in the 
expropriation of lands for enterprises. 
  Envisioned during the production of oil and gas and the 
construction of facilities at oil fields are: 
  -- a shift to a system of "storehouse-free" drilling, using 
the drilling mud for constructing roads and sites for 
installations; 
  -- replacement of the existing pipelines at oil fields by 
pipelines with factory-installed interior and exterior 
insulation, which will make it possible to preclude numerous 
pipeline defects due to corrosion and to reduce sharply 
environmental pollution from oil spills; 
  -- and to reduce sharply the burning of incidental gas by a 
factor of 4-5, the volume of the burning of which currently 
amounts to something on the order of 8 billion cubic meters. 
  The realization of the basic directions of the TEK's 
ecological policy is being carried out using an integrated 
systemic approach, taking into account the specifics of the key 
moments of the TEK's development on the basis of: 
  -- a new technological strategy; 
  -- the development of an environmental protection 
infrastructure; 
  -- the improvement of the economic and organizational forms 
of management; 
  -- the establishment of step-by-step ecological norms and 
requirements and the adoption of the necessary new legislative 
acts; 
  -- a basic change in the production and administrative 
structures at both the federal and regional levels under the 
conditions of a market economy and abandonment of the 
administrative and command system of management, with a view 
toward increasing the independence of local organs of authority 
in the adoption of solutions concerning a territory's economic 
development; 
  -- and further improvement of the economic principles for 
the 
use of natural resources and the use of ecological safeguards. 
  It is contemplated that, during the planning, construction 
and operation of TEK installations, a set of steady-state 
operations be carried out, including full-scale observations and 
research, the centralized formation of a data bank and the 
distribution of real-time information. In its most complete 
form, monitoring for large TEK installations should include the 
following systems: recording of the installation's operating 
conditions (shutdowns and their causes), of observations of the 
discharges and dumping of harmful substances and of other 
negative influences, of the monitoring of the radiation 
environment of the surrounding area, of measurements of the 
variables of weather conditions and the open air (air 
temperature, inversions, wind speed and direction, atmospheric 
precipitations and the composition of the open air), of 
integrated observations in water reservoirs and channels 
(hydrometric, hydrothermal, chemical hydrology and 
hydrobiological observations) and others, 20 systems in all. 
  It is envisioned that the listed set of observations and 
research will be introduced by 2010 at all large and 
medium-sized TEK installations. 
  Over the course of 1994-1995, as a state ecological study is 
carried out, 11 standard and technical documents for the TEK's 
ecological standard base will be drafted and published. 
  Russia's Energy Strategy is not a planning and directive 
document. It is the aggregate of the priorities and mechanisms 
for the realization of a new energy policy. During its 
realization, the Strategy will be adapted to the current 
economic situation. At the same time, the prospects for the 
TEK's development will necessarily determine the most important 
directions for Russia's economic revival. 

